Hawaii statutes.
§171-82 Approval by board. All
subdivisions of public lands and premises covered by residential leases, all
purchases and sales of improvements erected by lessees upon lots under
residential leases, and all purchases of the fee titles to the leasehold premises
by the lessees, and all sales of such fee simple titles during the ten-year
period following issuance of a patent or deed thereupon to any person not
disqualified under sections 171-74 and 171-75, shall be subject to approval by
the board of land and natural resources. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp,
§103A-78; HRS §171-82]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next